dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABĊDEFĠGGHĦIIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXZŻabċdefġgħghieiejklmnopqrstuvwxzżycYCáéíóúàèìòùñö</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"       c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"        c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="prn"         c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"         c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="np"          c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"          c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="rel"         c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="adv"         c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"         c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"      c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"      c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="dem"         c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ord"         c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="neg"         c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="an"          c="Animate / inanimate"/>
 
    <sdef n="m"           c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"           c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"          c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"          c="Masculine / feminine"/>
 
    <sdef n="top"         c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"         c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"         c="Cognomen"/>

    <sdef n="sg"          c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"          c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"          c="Singular / plural"/>
 
    <sdef n="p1"          c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"          c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"          c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="px1sg"       c="First person singular possessive"/>
 
    <sdef n="pres"        c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="past"        c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"         c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="ger"         c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="imp"         c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pp"          c="Past participle"/>

    <sdef n="subj"        c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"         c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="def"         c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"         c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"         c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="itg"         c="Interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="num"         c="Numeral"/>

    <sdef n="GD"          c="Gender to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="cm"          c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"        c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
 
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="g/erżuma__n_f">
      <e><p><l>erżuma</l><r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieżem</l><r>erżuma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="unjoni__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="toq/ba_sewda__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ba_sewda</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ob</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dixx__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/erva__n_f">
      <e><p><l>erva</l><r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riev</l><r>erva<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="toq/ba_tas-sorm__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ba_tas-sorm</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ob</l><r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/abiba__n_f">
      <e><p><l>abiba</l><r>abiba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obba</l><r>abiba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lanġas/a__n_f">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ifel__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ifel</l><r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fal</l><r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xemgħa__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/attus__n_m">
      <e><p><l>attus</l><r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tates</l><r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="orjentazzjoni/_sesswali__n_f">
      <e><p><l>_sesswali</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mogħ/ża__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ża</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oż</l><r>ża<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="unit/à_astronomika__n_f">
      <e><p><l>à_astronomika</l><r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajiet</l><r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lingw/a__n_f">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/attusa__n_f">
      <e><p><l>attusa</l><r>attusa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tates</l><r>attusa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/abib__n_m">
      <e><p><l>abib</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obba</l><r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħsi/eb__n_m">
      <e><p><l>eb</l><r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bijiet</l><r>eb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="karit/à__n_f">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajiet</l><r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gz/ira__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjer</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="buff/u__n_m">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/offa__n_f">
      <e><p><l>offa</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ufftejn</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/erv__n_m">
      <e><p><l>erv</l><r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riev</l><r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ardal__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ardal</l><r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>radal</l><r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="siġġ/u__n_m">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/urnata__n_f">
      <e><p><l>urnata</l><r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ranet</l><r>urnata<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/eħen__n_m">
      <e><p><l>eħen</l><r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iħna</l><r>eħen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/alb__n_m">
      <e><p><l>alb</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lub</l><r>alb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nagħ/ġa__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ġa</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aġ</l><r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tuffi/eħa__n_f">
      <e><p><l>eħa</l><r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħiet</l><r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tabiba"><i>t</i><par n="t/abiba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="frawla"><i>frawl</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karità"><i>karit</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="varjetà"><i>varjet</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fardal"><i>f</i><par n="f/ardal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenerazzjoni"><i>ġenerazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reliġjon"><i>reliġjon</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nagħġa"><i>nagħ</i><par n="nagħ/ġa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="annimala"><i>annimal</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="popolazzjoni"><i>popolazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="deċiżjoni"><i>deċiżjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sigarru"><i>sigarr</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="qattus"><i>q</i><par n="q/attus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kowt"><i>kowt</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ripressjoni"><i>ripressjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="orjentazzjoni_sesswali"><i>orjentazzjoni</i><par n="orjentazzjoni/_sesswali__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lingwa"><i>lingw</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba_tas-sorm"><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba_tas-sorm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="superstizzjoni"><i>superstizzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kaptana"><i>kaptan</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="traġedja"><i>traġedj</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="teknoloġija"><i>teknoloġij</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żrinġ"><i>żrinġ</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gzira"><i>gz</i><par n="gz/ira__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kanzunetta"><i>kanzunett</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tifel"><i>t</i><par n="t/ifel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="manifestazzjoni"><i>manifestazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tabib"><i>t</i><par n="t/abib__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kwistjoni"><i>kwistjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="varjazzjoni"><i>varjazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerva"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erva__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="unità_astronomika"><i>unit</i><par n="unit/à_astronomika__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="invenzjoni"><i>invenzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fakultà"><i>fakult</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħsieb"><i>ħsi</i><par n="ħsi/eb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="poeżija"><i>poeżij</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tuffieħa"><i>tuffi</i><par n="tuffi/eħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qattusa"><i>q</i><par n="q/attusa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="liebru"><i>liebr</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="erezzjoni"><i>erezzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gerżuma"><i>g</i><par n="g/erżuma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dixx"><i>dixx</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="proprjetà"><i>proprjet</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dukessa"><i>dukess</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pronunzja"><i>pronunzj</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="adorazzjoni"><i>adorazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kwalità"><i>kwalit</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerv"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/erv__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="buffu"><i>buff</i><par n="buff/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sigurtà"><i>sigurt</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="leħen"><i>l</i><par n="l/eħen__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mogħża"><i>mogħ</i><par n="mogħ/ża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pustuletta"><i>pustulett</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xemgħa"><i>xemgħa</i><par n="xemgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xoffa"><i>x</i><par n="x/offa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lanġasa"><i>lanġas</i><par n="lanġas/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurnata"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/urnata__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="larinġa"><i>larinġ</i><par n="lanġas/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="siġġu"><i>siġġ</i><par n="siġġ/u__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="operazzjoni"><i>operazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qalb"><i>q</i><par n="q/alb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="diffikultà"><i>diffikult</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba_sewda"><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba_sewda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="soċjetà"><i>soċjet</i><par n="karit/à__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="formazzjoni"><i>formazzjoni</i><par n="unjoni__n_f"/></e>
